Hawaii statutes.
[§155-32] Hawaii water
infrastructure loan program. There is established a Hawaii water
infrastructure loan program, which shall be a loan program as defined under
section 39-51. The program shall be administered by the department in a manner
consistent with chapter 39, part III. This loan program may include:

(1) Loans made, on terms approved by the department, to
private entities, whether corporations, partnerships, limited liability
companies, or other persons, which entities may lease or provide water
infrastructure equipment to utility customers; and

(2) Direct loans to utility customers, on terms
approved by the department. [L 2016, c 171, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next